Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-410
Prisoner; lawful arrest; detention.

Any officer or other person having in lawful custody any person accused of an offense for the purpose of bringing him before the proper magistrate or court, may place and detain such prisoner in any county jail of this state for one night or longer, as the occasion may require, so as to answer the purposes of the arrest and custody.

G.S.1873, c. 58, § 292, p. 791;

R.S.1913, § 8946;

C.S.1922, § 9970;

C.S.1929, § 29-410;

R.S.1943, § 29-410.

The Fourth Amendment to the U.S. Constitution requires a prompt judicial determination of probable cause as a prerequisite to an extended pretrial detention following a warrantless arrest. State v. Nissen, 252 Neb. 51, 560 N.W.2d 157 (1997).

Jury was properly instructed as to duties of sheriff to arrest and detain under this section. O'Dell v. Goodsell, 152 Neb. 290, 41 N.W.2d 123 (1950).

In action against sheriff for false imprisonment on theory that plaintiff was detained without warrant, evidence was sufficient to establish that plaintiff's arrest and detention were lawful. Martin v. Sanford, 129 Neb. 212, 261 N.W. 136 (1935).